District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Alpha Omega Social Action and Scholarship Foundation Real Property
Tax Exemption Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-1099.17. Alpha Omega Social Action and Scholarship Foundation; Lot 813, Square
2853.”.
(b) A new section 47-1099.17 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.17. Alpha Omega Social Action and Scholarship Foundation; Lot 813, Square
2853.
“(a) The real property, and any improvements on the property, located at 1231 Harvard
Street, N.W., known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot 813, Square 2853 (“Property”), shall


be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title; provided that the Property is owned by
Alpha Omega Social Action and Scholarship Foundation; and provided further, that the Property
is used for its charitable and educational purposes, and is not used for commercial purposes.
“(b) The tax exemption provided pursuant to this section shall be in addition to and not in
lieu of any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to Alpha Omega Social
Action and Scholarship Foundation.”.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia orders that all real property taxes,
interest, penalties, fees, and other related charges assessed against Lot 813, Square 2853 for the
period between October 1, 2018 and September 30, 2026, be forgiven. Any payments of real
property taxes, interest, penalties, fees, or other related charges made prior to the effective date
of this act shall be refunded to the person who made the payments no later than 45 days after the
effect date of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(I) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.